Washington statutes.
RCW 43.378.010

Purpose of chapter.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide for the allocation of revenues distributed to the state under section 35 of the Mineral Lands Leasing Act of 1920, as amended (30 U.S.C. Sec. 191), with respect to activities of the United States bureau of land management undertaken pursuant to the Geothermal Steam Act of 1970 (30 U.S.C. Sec. 1001 et seq.) in order to accomplish the following general objectives:

(1) Reduction of dependence on nonrenewable energy and stimulation of the state's economy through development of geothermal energy.

(2) Mitigation of the social, economic, and environmental impacts of geothermal development.

(3) Maintenance of the productivity of renewable resources through the investment of proceeds from these resources.

[ 2013 c 274 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2013 c 274: See note following RCW 78.60.030.